California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(i) “Continued custody” means physical custody or legal custody or both, under any applicable tribal law or tribal custom or state law, that a parent or Indian custodian already has or had at any time in the past. The biological mother of an Indian child is deemed to have had custody of the Indian child.

(j) “Custody” means physical custody or legal custody or both, under any applicable tribal law or tribal custom or state law.

(k) “Domicile” means either of the following:

(1) For a parent, Indian custodian, or legal guardian, the place that a person has been physically present and that the person regards as home. This includes a person’s true, fixed, principal, and permanent home, to which that person intends to return and remain indefinitely even though the person may be currently residing elsewhere.

(2) For an Indian child, the domicile of the Indian child’s parents, Indian custodian, or legal guardian. In the case of an Indian child whose parents are not married to each other, the domicile of the Indian child means the domicile of the Indian child’s custodial parent.

(l) “Emergency proceeding” for purposes of juvenile dependency proceedings is the initial petition hearing held pursuant to Section 319.

(m) “Indian foster home” means a foster home where one or more of the licensed or approved foster parents is an Indian as defined in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a).

(n) “Involuntary proceeding” means an Indian child custody proceeding in which the parent does not consent of their free will to the foster care, preadoptive, or adoptive placement, or termination of parental rights. “Involuntary proceeding” also means an Indian child custody proceeding in which the parent consents to the foster care, preadoptive, or adoptive placement, under threat of removal of the child by a state court or agency.

(o) “Status offense” means an offense that would not be considered criminal if committed by an adult, including, but not limited to, school truancy and incorrigibility.

(p) “Upon demand” means, in the case of an Indian child, the parent or Indian custodian may regain physical custody during a voluntary proceeding simply upon verbal request, without any delay, formalities, or contingencies.

(q) “Voluntary proceeding” means an Indian child custody proceeding, as defined in subdivision (d), that is not an involuntary proceeding, where both parents have,
 or the Indian custodian has, of their free will, without a threat of removal by a state agency, consented to the placement of the Indian child, or a proceeding for voluntary termination of parental rights.

(r) “Tribally approved home” means a home that has been licensed or approved by an Indian child’s tribe, or a tribe or tribal organization designated by the Indian child’s tribe, for foster care or adoptive placement of an Indian child using standards established by the child’s tribe pursuant to Section 1915 of the federal Indian Child Welfare Act (25 U.S.C. Sec. 1901 et seq.) and as described by Section 10553.12. A tribally approved home is not required to be licensed or approved by the state or county and is equivalent to a state-licensed or county-licensed or approved home, including an approved resource family home. Background
 check requirements for foster care or adoptive placement as required by Sections 1522 and 1522.1 of the Health and Safety Code shall apply to a tribally approved home.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 656, Sec. 2.   (AB 81)   Effective September 27, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

224.2.

(a) The court, county welfare department, and the probation department have an affirmative and continuing duty to inquire whether a child for whom a petition under Section 300, 601, or 602 may be or has been filed, is or may be an Indian child.

(b) (1) The duty to inquire begins for a county when first contacted regarding a child, including, but not limited to, asking a party reporting child abuse or neglect whether the party has any information that the child may be an Indian
 child, and upon a county department’s first contact with the child or the child’s family, including extended family members as defined in paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) of Section 224.1. At the first contact with the child and each family member, including extended family members, the county welfare department or county probation department has a duty to inquire whether that child is or may be an Indian child.

(2) If a child is placed into the temporary custody of a county
 probation department pursuant to Section 307, or received and maintained in temporary custody of a county welfare department pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 306, or taken into or maintained in the temporary custody of a county welfare department pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 306, or if they were initially taken into protective custody pursuant to a warrant described in Section 340, the county welfare department or county probation department has a duty to inquire whether
 that child is an Indian child. Inquiry includes, but is not limited to, asking the child, parents, legal guardian, Indian custodian, extended family members, others who have an interest in the child, and the party reporting child abuse or neglect, whether the child is, or may be, an Indian child and where the child, the parents, or Indian
 custodian is domiciled.

(c) For a court presiding over any juvenile proceeding that could result in placement of an Indian child with someone other than a parent or Indian custodian, including proceedings where the parents or Indian custodian have voluntarily consented to placement of the child, the duty to inquire begins at the first hearing on a petition. At the commencement of the hearing, the court shall ask each party to the proceeding and all other interested persons present whether the child is, or may be, an Indian child, whether they know or have reason to know that
 the child is an Indian child, and where the child, the parents, or Indian custodian are domiciled, as defined in Section 224.1. Inquiry shall also be made at the first appearance in court of each party or interested person who was not present at the first hearing on the petition. The inquiry and responses shall occur on the record. The court shall instruct the parties and persons present to inform the court if they subsequently receive information that provides reason to know the child is, or may be, an Indian child.

(d) There is reason to know a child involved in a proceeding is an Indian child under any of the following circumstances:

(1) A person having an interest in the child, including the child, an officer of the court, a tribe, an Indian organization, a public or private agency, or a member of the child’s extended family informs the court that the child is an Indian child.

(2) The residence or domicile of the child, the child’s parents, or Indian custodian is on a reservation or in an Alaska Native
 village, as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 1602 of Title 43 of the United State Code.

(3) Any participant in the proceeding, officer of the court, Indian tribe, Indian organization, or agency informs the court that it has discovered information indicating that the child is an Indian child.

(4) The child who is the subject of the proceeding gives the court reason to know that the child is an Indian child.

(5) The court is informed that the child is or has been a ward of a tribal court.

(6) The court is informed that either parent or the child possess an identification card indicating membership or citizenship in an Indian tribe.

(e) If the court, social worker, or probation officer has reason to believe that an Indian child is involved in a proceeding, but does not have sufficient information to determine that there is reason to know that the child is an Indian child, the court, social worker, or probation officer shall make further inquiry regarding the possible Indian status of the child, and shall make that inquiry as soon as practicable.

(1) There is reason to believe a child involved in a proceeding is an Indian child whenever the court, social worker, or probation officer has information suggesting that either the parent of the child or the child is a member or citizen, or may be eligible for membership or citizenship, in an Indian tribe. Information suggesting membership or eligibility for
 membership includes, but is not limited to, information that indicates, but does not establish, the existence of one or more of the grounds for reason to know enumerated in paragraphs (1) to (6), inclusive, of subdivision (d).

(2) When there is reason to believe the child is an Indian child, further inquiry is necessary to help the court, social worker, or probation officer determine whether there is reason to know a child is an Indian child. Further inquiry includes, but is not limited to, all of the following:

(A) Interviewing the parents, Indian custodian, and extended family members to
 gather the information required in paragraph (5) of subdivision (a) of Section 224.3.

(B) Contacting the Bureau of Indian Affairs and the State Department of Social Services for assistance in identifying the names and contact information of the tribes in which the child may be a member or citizen, or eligible for membership or citizenship in, and contacting the tribes and any other person that may reasonably be expected to have information regarding the child’s membership status or eligibility.

(C) Contacting the tribe or tribes and any other person that may reasonably be expected to have information regarding the child’s membership, citizenship status, or eligibility. Contact with a tribe shall,
 at a minimum, include telephone, facsimile, or electronic mail contact to each tribe’s designated agent for receipt of notices under the federal Indian Child Welfare Act of 1978 (25 U.S.C. Sec. 1901 et seq.). Contact with a tribe shall include sharing information identified by the tribe as necessary for the tribe to make a membership or citizenship eligibility determination, as well as information on the current status of the child and the case.

(f) If there is reason to know, as set forth in subdivision (d), that the child is an Indian child, the party seeking foster care placement with someone other than a parent or Indian custodian shall provide notice in accordance with
 Section 224.3.

(g) If there is reason to know the child is an Indian child, but the court does not have sufficient evidence to determine that the child is or is not an Indian child, the court shall confirm, by way of a report, declaration, or testimony included in the record that the agency or other party used due diligence to identify and work with all of the tribes of which there is reason to know the child may be a member or citizen, or eligible for membership or citizenship, to verify whether the child is in fact a member or whether a biological parent is a member and the child is eligible for membership or citizenship.

(h) A determination by an Indian tribe that a
 child is or is not a member or citizen of, or eligible for membership or citizenship in, that tribe, or testimony attesting to that status by a person authorized by the tribe to provide that determination, shall be conclusive. Information that the child is not enrolled, or is not eligible for enrollment in, the tribe is not determinative of the child’s membership or citizenship status unless the tribe also confirms in writing that enrollment is a prerequisite for membership
 or citizenship under tribal law or custom.

(i) (1) When there is reason to know that the child is an Indian child, the court shall treat the child as an Indian child unless and until the court determines on the record and after review of the report of due diligence as described in subdivision (h), and a review of the copies of notice, return receipts, and tribal responses required pursuant to Section 224.3, that the child does not meet the definition of an Indian child as used in Section 224.1 and the federal Indian Child Welfare Act of 1978 (25 U.S.C. Sec. 1901 et seq.).

(2) If the court makes a finding that proper and adequate further inquiry and due diligence as required in this section have been conducted and there is no reason to know whether the
 child is an Indian child, the court may make a finding that the federal Indian Child Welfare Act of 1978 (25 U.S.C. Sec. 1901 et seq.) does not apply to the proceedings, subject to reversal based on sufficiency of the evidence. The court shall reverse its determination if it subsequently receives information providing reason to believe that the child is an Indian child and order the social worker or probation officer to conduct further inquiry as described in Section 224.3.

(j) Notwithstanding a determination that the federal Indian Child Welfare Act of 1978 does not apply to the proceedings, if the court, social worker, or probation officer subsequently receives any information required by Section 224.3 that was not previously available or included in the notice issued under Section 224.3, the party seeking placement shall provide
 the additional information to any tribes entitled to notice under Section 224.3 and to the Secretary of the Interior’s designated agent.

(k) Notwithstanding any other provision, an Indian child’s tribe may participate by telephone, or other remote appearance options, in proceedings in which the federal Indian Child Welfare Act of 1978 (25 U.S.C. Sec. 1901 et seq.) may apply. The method of appearance may be determined by the court consistent with court
 capacity and contractual obligations, and taking into account the capacity of the tribe, as long as a method of effective remote appearance and participation sufficient to allow the tribe to fully exercise its rights is provided. Fees shall not be charged for court appearances established under this subdivision conducted in whole or in part by remote means.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 656, Sec. 3.   (AB 81)   Effective September 27, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

224.3.

(a) If the court, a social worker, or probation officer knows or has reason to know, as described in subdivision (d) of Section 224.2, that an Indian child is involved, notice pursuant to Section 1912 of the federal Indian Child Welfare Act of 1978 (25 U.S.C. Sec. 1901 et seq.) shall be provided for hearings that may culminate in an order for foster care placement, termination of parental rights, preadoptive placement, or adoptive placement, as described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (d) of Section 224.1. The notice shall be sent to the minor’s parents or legal guardian, Indian custodian, if any, and the child’s tribe. Copies of all notices sent shall be served on all parties to the dependency proceeding and their attorneys. Notice shall comply
 with all of the following requirements:

(1) Notice shall be sent by registered or certified mail with return receipt requested. Additional notice by first-class mail is recommended, but not required.

(2) Notice to the tribe shall be to the tribal chairperson, unless the tribe has designated another agent for service.

(3) Notice of all Indian child custody hearings shall be sent by the party seeking placement of the child to all of the following:

(A) All tribes of which the child may be a member or citizen, or eligible for membership or citizenship, unless either of the following occur:

(i) A
 tribe has made a determination that the child is not a member or citizen, or eligible for membership or citizenship.

(ii) The court makes a determination as to which tribe is the child’s tribe in accordance with subdivision (e) of Section 224.1, after which notice need only be sent to the Indian child’s tribe.

(B) The child’s parents.

(C) The child’s Indian custodian.

(4) Notice, to the extent required by federal law, shall be sent to the Secretary of the Interior’s designated agent.

(5) In addition to the information specified in other sections of this article, notice shall include all of the following
 information:

(A) The name, birth date, and birthplace of the Indian child, if known.

(B) The name of the Indian tribe in which the child is a member or citizen, or may be eligible for membership or citizenship, if known.

(C) All names known of the Indian child’s biological parents, grandparents, and great-grandparents, or Indian custodians, including maiden, married, and former names or aliases, as well as their current and former addresses, birth dates, places of birth and death, tribal enrollment, membership, or citizenship information of other direct lineal ancestors of the child, and any other identifying information, if known.

(D) A copy of the
 petition by which the proceeding was initiated.

(E) A copy of the child’s birth certificate, if available.

(F) The location, mailing address, and telephone number of the court and all parties notified pursuant to this section.

(G) The information regarding the time, date, and any location of any scheduled hearings.

(H) A statement of all of the following:

(i) The name of the petitioner and the name and address of the petitioner’s attorney.

(ii) The absolute right of the child’s parents, Indian custodians, and tribe to intervene in the
 proceeding.

(iii) The right of the child’s parents, Indian custodians, and tribe to petition the court to transfer the proceeding to the tribal court of the Indian child’s tribe, absent objection by either parent and subject to declination by the tribal court.

(iv) The right of the child’s parents, Indian custodians, and tribe to, upon request, be granted up to an additional 20 days from the receipt of the notice to prepare for the proceeding.

(v) The potential legal consequences of the proceedings on the future custodial and parental rights of the child’s parents or Indian custodians.

(vi) That if the parents or Indian custodians are unable to afford counsel,
 counsel will be appointed to represent the parents or Indian custodians pursuant to Section 1912 of the federal Indian Child Welfare Act of 1978.

(vii) In accordance with Section 827, the information contained in the notice, petition, pleading, and other court documents is confidential. Any person or entity notified shall maintain the confidentiality of the information contained in the notice concerning the particular proceeding and not reveal that information to anyone who does not need the information in order to exercise the tribe’s rights under the federal Indian Child Welfare Act of 1978.

(b) Notice shall be sent whenever it is known or there is reason to know that an Indian child is involved, and for every hearing that may culminate in an order for foster care placement,
 termination of parental rights, preadoptive placement, or adoptive placement, as described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (d) of Section 224.1, unless it is determined that the federal Indian Child Welfare Act of 1978 does not apply to the case in accordance with Section 224.2. After a tribe acknowledges that the child is a member of, or eligible for membership in, that tribe, or after a tribe intervenes in a proceeding, the information set out in subparagraphs (C), (D), (E), and (H) of paragraph (5) of subdivision (a) need not be included with the notice.

(c) Proof of the notice, including copies of notices sent and all return receipts and responses received, shall be filed with the court in advance of the hearing, except as permitted under subdivision (d).

(d) A
 proceeding shall not be held until at least 10 days after receipt of notice by the parent, Indian custodian, the tribe, or the Bureau of Indian Affairs, except for a hearing held pursuant to Section 319, provided that notice of the hearing held pursuant to Section 319 shall be given as soon as possible after the filing of the petition to declare the Indian child a dependent child. Notice to tribes of the hearing pursuant to Section 319 shall be consistent with the requirements for notice to parents set forth in Sections 290.1 and 290.2. With the exception of the hearing held pursuant to Section 319, the parent, Indian custodian, or tribe shall, upon request, be granted up to 20 additional days to prepare for that proceeding. This subdivision does not limit the rights of the parent, Indian custodian, or tribe to more than 10 days’ notice when a lengthier notice period is required by law.

(e) With respect to giving notice to Indian tribes, a party is subject to court sanctions if that person knowingly and willfully falsifies or conceals a material fact concerning whether the child is an Indian child, or counsels a party to do so.

(f) The inclusion of contact information of any adult or child that would otherwise be required to be included in the notification pursuant to this section shall not be required if that person is at risk of harm as a result of domestic violence, child abuse, sexual abuse, or stalking.

(g) For any hearing that does not meet the definition of an Indian child custody proceeding set forth in subdivision (d) of Section 224.1, or is not an emergency proceeding, notice to the child’s parents,
 Indian custodian, and tribe shall be sent in accordance with Sections 292, 293, and 295.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 656, Sec. 4.   (AB 81)   Effective September 27, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

224.4.

The Indian child’s tribe and Indian custodian, as defined in Section 224.1, have the right to intervene at any point in an Indian child custody proceeding.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 656, Sec. 5.   (AB 81)   Effective September 27, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

224.5.

In an Indian child custody proceeding, as defined in subdivision (d) of Section 224.1, the court shall give full faith and credit to the public acts, records, judicial proceedings, and judgments of any Indian tribe applicable to the proceeding to the same extent that such entities give full faith and credit to the public acts, records, judicial proceedings, and judgments of any other entity regardless of whether the Indian child’s tribe exercises the right to intervene under Section 224.4.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 656, Sec. 6.   (AB 81)   Effective September 27, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

224.6.

(a) When testimony of a “qualified expert witness” is required in an Indian child custody proceeding, a “qualified expert witness” shall be qualified to testify regarding whether continued custody of the child by the parent or Indian custodian is likely to result in serious emotional or physical damage to the child and shall be qualified to testify to the prevailing social and cultural standards of the Indian child’s tribe. A person may be designated by the child’s tribe as qualified to testify to the prevailing social and cultural standards of the Indian child’s tribe. The individual may not be an employee of the person or agency recommending foster care placement,
 preadoptive placement, adoptive placement, adoption, or termination of parental rights.

(b) In considering whether to remove an Indian child from the custody of a parent or Indian custodian or to terminate the parental rights of the parent of an Indian child, the court shall do both of the following:

(1) Require that a qualified expert witness testify regarding whether continued custody of the child by the parent or Indian custodian is likely to result in serious emotional or physical damage to the child.

(2) Consider evidence concerning the prevailing social and cultural standards of the Indian child’s tribe, including that tribe’s family organization and child-rearing
 practices.

(c) Persons with the following characteristics are most likely to meet the requirements for a qualified expert witness for purposes of Indian child custody proceedings:

(1) A person designated by the Indian child’s tribe as being qualified to testify to the prevailing social and cultural standards of the Indian child’s tribe.

(2) A member or citizen of the Indian child’s tribe who is recognized by the tribal community as knowledgeable in tribal customs as they pertain to family organization and child-rearing practices.

(3) An expert witness having substantial experience in the delivery of child and family services to Indians, and extensive knowledge
 of prevailing social and cultural standards and child-rearing practices within the Indian child’s tribe.

(d) The court or any party may request the assistance of the Indian child’s tribe or Bureau of Indian Affairs agency serving the Indian child’s tribe in locating persons qualified to serve as expert witnesses.

(e) The court may accept a declaration or affidavit from a qualified expert witness in lieu of testimony only if the parties have so stipulated in writing and the court is satisfied the stipulation is made knowingly, intelligently, and voluntarily.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 656, Sec. 7.   (AB 81)   Effective September 27, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

224.7.

The State Department of Social Services may establish and administer programs designed to facilitate tribal participation in Indian child custody proceedings, as defined in subdivision (d) of Section 224.1, including, but not limited to, the programs described by Sections 10553.1 through 10553.25, inclusive. Administration of these programs shall be coordinated as described in Section 16500.9, in conjunction with other relevant divisions within the department.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 656, Sec. 8.   (AB 81)   Effective September 27, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 1.5. Youth Bill of Rights [224.70. - 224.74.]

224.70.

For the purposes of this article: 

(a) “Extended family member” means any adult related to the youth by blood, adoption, or marriage, and any adult who has an established familial or mentoring relationship with the youth, including, but not limited to, godparents, clergy, teachers, neighbors, and family friends.

(b) “Juvenile facility” means a place of confinement that is operated by, or contracted for, the county probation department or juvenile court for the purpose of the confinement of youth who are taken into custody and alleged to be within the description of Section 601 or 602 who are adjudged to be a ward
 of the court.

(c) “Youth” means any person detained in a juvenile facility.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 786, Sec. 1.   (AB 2417)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

224.71.

It is the policy of the state that all youth confined in a juvenile facility shall have the following rights, which are established by existing law and regulation:

(a) To live in a safe, healthy, and clean environment conducive to treatment, positive youth development, and healing and where they are treated with dignity and respect.

(b) To be free from physical, sexual, emotional, or other abuse, or corporal punishment.

(c) To receive adequate and healthy meals and snacks, clean water at any time, timely access to toilets, access to daily showers, sufficient personal hygiene items, clean
 bedding, and clean clothing in good repair, including clean undergarments on a daily basis, and new underwear that fits. Clothing, grooming, and hygiene products shall be adequate and respect the child’s culture, ethnicity, and gender identity and expression.

(d) To receive adequate, appropriate, and timely medical, reproductive, dental, vision, behavioral health, and mental health services provided by qualified professionals and consistent with current professional standards of care.

(e) To refuse the administration of psychotropic and other medications consistent with applicable law or unless immediately necessary for the preservation of life or the prevention of serious bodily
 harm.

(f) To not be searched for the purpose of harassment or humiliation, a form of discipline or punishment, or to verify the youth’s gender. To searches that preserve the privacy and dignity of the person and to have access to a written search policy at any time, including the policy on who may perform searches.

(g) To maintain frequent and continuing contact with parents, guardians, siblings, children, and extended family members, through visits, telephone calls, and mail. Youth may be provided with access to computer technology and the internet for maintaining relationships with family as an alternative, but not as a replacement for, in-person visiting.

(h) To make and receive confidential telephone calls, send and receive
 confidential mail, and have confidential visits with attorneys and their authorized representatives, ombudspersons, including the Division of the Ombudsperson of the Office of Youth and Community Restoration, and other advocates, holders of public office, state and federal court personnel, and legal service organizations.

(i) To have fair and equal access to all available services, housing, care, treatment, and benefits, and to not be subjected to discrimination or harassment on the basis of actual or perceived race, ethnicity, ancestry, national origin, language, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, gender expression, mental or physical disability, immigration status, or HIV status.

(j) To have daily opportunities for age-appropriate physical exercise and
 recreation, including time spent outdoors and access to leisure reading, letter writing, and entertainment.

(k) To contact attorneys, ombudspersons, including the Division of the Ombudsperson of the Office of Youth and Community Restoration, and other advocates, and representatives of state or local agencies, regarding conditions of confinement or violations of rights, and to be free from retaliation for making these contacts or complaints.

(l) To exercise the religious or spiritual practice of their choice and to participate in or refuse to participate in religious services and activities.

(m) To not be deprived of any of the following as a disciplinary measure: food, contact with parents, guardians, family, or attorneys,
 sleep, exercise, education, bedding, clothing, access to religious services, a daily shower, clean water, a toilet, hygiene products, medical services, reading material, or the right to send and receive mail; to not be subject to room confinement as a disciplinary measure; to access written disciplinary policies, including the right to be informed of accusations against them, have an opportunity to be heard, present evidence and testimony, and their right to appeal disciplinary decisions.

(n) To receive a rigorous, quality education that complies with state law, and the abilities of students and prepares them for high school graduation, career entry, and postsecondary education; to attend appropriate level school classes and vocational training; to have access to postsecondary academic and career technical education courses and
 programs; to have access to computer technology and the internet for the purposes of education and to continue to receive educational services while on disciplinary or medical status; and to have access to information about the educational options available to youth.

(o) To information about their rights as parents, including available parental support, reunification advocacy, and opportunities to maintain or develop a connection with their children; to access educational information or programming about pregnancy, infant care, parenting, and breast-feeding, and childhood development; to proper prenatal care, diet, vitamins, nutrition, and medical treatment; to counseling for pregnant and
 postpartum youth; to not be restrained by the use of leg irons, waist chains, or handcuffs behind the body while pregnant or in recovery after delivery; to not be restrained during a medical emergency, labor, delivery, or recovery unless deemed necessary for their safety and security, and to have restraints removed when a medical professional determines removal is medically necessary; and to access written policies about pregnant, postpartum, and lactating youth.

(p) To attend all court hearings pertaining to them.

(q) To have counsel and a prompt probable
 cause hearing when detained on probation violations.

(r) To make at least two free telephone calls within an hour after initially being placed in a juvenile facility following an arrest.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 163, Sec. 1.   (SB 1353)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

224.72.

(a) Every juvenile facility shall provide each youth who is placed in the facility with an age and developmentally appropriate orientation that includes an explanation and a copy of the rights and responsibilities of the youth, as specified in Section 224.71, as designed and provided by the Ombudsperson of the Office of Youth and Community Restoration pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 2200, and that addresses the youth’s questions and concerns.

(b) Each juvenile facility shall post posters designed and provided by the Ombudsperson of the Office of Youth and Community Restoration pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 2200 that list the rights provided by Section 224.71 in a conspicuous location, including classrooms, living units, and near the telephones that youth can use to call the ombudsperson.

(c) A copy of the rights of the youth shall be provided to parents or guardians of each youth placed in a juvenile facility. The posters and brochures designed and provided by the Ombudsperson of the Office of Youth and Community Restoration pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 2200, with copies in English, Spanish, and other languages, shall also be made available in the lobbies and visiting areas of juvenile justice facilities and, upon request, to parents or guardians.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 26, Sec. 11.   (AB 152)   Effective June 29, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

224.73.

All juvenile facilities shall ensure the safety and dignity of all youth in their care and shall not discriminate against any youth on the basis of actual or perceived race, ethnicity, ancestry, national origin, color, religion, gender, sexual orientation, gender identity, gender expression, mental or physical disability, immigration status, or HIV status.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 786, Sec. 4.   (AB 2417)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

224.74.

The Office of Youth and Community Restoration, in consultation with youth, youth advocate and support groups, and groups representing children, families, children’s facilities, and other interested parties, shall develop, no later than July 1, 2023, standardized information explaining the rights specified in Section 224.71. The information developed shall be age-appropriate.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 786, Sec. 5.   (AB 2417)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Commissions and Committees [225. - 236.]

225.

In each county there shall be a juvenile justice commission consisting of not less than 7 and no more than 15 citizens. Two or more of the members shall be persons who are between 14 and 21 years of age, provided there are available persons between 14 and 21 years of age who are able to carry out the duties of a commission member in a manner satisfactory to the appointing authority. Each person serving as a member of a probation committee immediately prior to September 15, 1961, shall be a member of the juvenile justice commission and shall continue to serve as such until such time as his or her term of appointment as a member of the probation committee would have expired under any prior provision of law. Upon a vacancy occurring in the membership of the commission and upon the expiration of the term of office of any member, a successor shall be appointed by the presiding judge of the superior court with the concurrence of the judge of the juvenile court or, in a county having more than one judge of the juvenile court, with the concurrence of the presiding judge of the juvenile court for a term of four years. When a vacancy occurs for any reason other than the expiration of a term of office, the appointee to fill such vacancy shall hold office for the unexpired term of his or her predecessor.

Appointments may be made by the presiding judge of the superior court, in the same manner designated in this section for the filling of vacancies, to increase the membership of a commission to the maximum of 15 in any county which has a commission with a membership of less than 15 members.

In any county in which the membership of the commission, on the effective date of amendments to this section enacted at the 1971 Regular Session of the Legislature, exceeds the maximum number permitted by this section, no additional appointments shall be made until the number of commissioners is less than the maximum number permitted by this section. In any case, such county’s commission membership shall, on or after January 1, 1974, be no greater than the maximum permitted by this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 751, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

226.

In lieu of county juvenile justice commissions, the boards of supervisors of two or more adjacent counties may agree to establish a regional juvenile justice commission consisting of not less than eight citizens, and having a sufficient number of members so that their appointment may be equally apportioned between the participating counties. Two or more of the members shall be persons who are between 14 and 21 years of age, provided there are available persons between 14 and 21 years of age who are able to carry out the duties of a commission member in a manner satisfactory to the appointing authority. The presiding judge of the superior court with the concurrence of the judge of the juvenile court or, in a county having more than one judge of the juvenile court, with the concurrence of the presiding judge of the juvenile court of each of the participating counties shall appoint an equal number of members to the regional justice commission and they shall hold office for a term of four years. Of those first appointed, however, if the number appointed be an even number, half shall serve for a term of two years and half shall serve for a term of four years and if the number of members first appointed be an odd number, the greater number nearest half shall serve for a term of two years and the remainder shall serve for a term of four years. The respective terms of the members first appointed shall be determined by lot as soon as possible after their appointment. Upon a vacancy occurring in the membership of the commission and upon the expiration of the term of office of any member, a successor shall be appointed by the presiding judge of the superior court with the concurrence of the judge of the juvenile court or, in a county having more than one judge of the juvenile court, with the concurrence of the presiding judge of the juvenile court of the county which originally appointed such vacating or retiring member. When a vacancy occurs for any reason other than the expiration of a term of office, the appointee shall hold office for the unexpired term of his or her predecessor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 751, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

227.
